Hawaii statutes.
[§431R-6] Application. If this chapter or any provision of this chapter
conflicts at any time with any federal law, then the federal law shall prevail
and this chapter or the relevant provisions of this chapter shall become
ineffective and invalid. The ineffectiveness or invalidity of this chapter or
any of its provisions shall not affect any other provisions or applications of
this chapter, which shall be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end, the provisions of this chapter are severable.
[L 2013, c 226, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next